Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 5. Corporation Property.

Sec. 42.40.350.
Land.

The corporation shall receive from the United States and, in its own name, take title to all rail property transferred under 45 U.S.C. 1201 — 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982), except that the corporation does not have authority over any right, title, or interest in property transferred under this subsection that was not vested in the United States at the time of transfer. All land that is transferred or acquired by the corporation is designated as follows:

railroad rights-of-way are railroad utility corridors;

land outside railroad utility corridors is rail land.

Railroad utility corridors shall be of a width at least 100 feet on both sides of the centerline of the extended main or branch line, unless the corporation does not own or control sufficient land to allow a corridor of that width. Railroad utility corridors may be surveyed by the metes and bounds method. The corporation may not convey its entire interest in land within a utility corridor except as provided in AS

42.40.285

,

42.40.370(d)

and

42.40.400

. However, the corporation may lease, subject to AS

42.40.285

and (d) of this section, grant easements in or permits for, or otherwise authorize use of portions of a utility corridor for transportation, communication, and transmission purposes and support functions associated with those purposes, and for commercial and other uses authorized under this chapter if the use does not restrict other parallel uses of the utility corridor.

The corporation may lease, subject to AS

42.40.285

and (d) of this section, grant easements in or permits for, or otherwise authorize use of portions of rail land. However, the corporation may not convey its entire interest in rail land except as provided in AS

42.40.285

,

42.40.352

,

42.40.370(d)

, and

42.40.400

.

A lease or disposal of land approved by the legislature under AS

42.40.285

by the corporation to a party other than the state shall be made at fair market value as determined by a qualified appraiser or by competitive bid.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 2010; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under (a) of this section, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in the introductory language of (a), added “, except that the corporation does not have authority over any right, title, or interest in property transferred under this subsection that was not vested in the United States at the time of transfer” at the end of the first sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska Const., art. VIII, § 10, requiring public notice of the leasing of state lands, requires that the Alaska Railroad give prior public notice whenever it proposes to lease railroad lands.
The word “state” throughout article VIII encompasses all lands held in common by the political community of Alaskan citizens rather than only those lands nominally held by one of the principle departments of the executive branch.
March 8, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Lands belonging to the Alaska Railroad Corporation are not within “legislative designations” as that term is used in AS

38.05.800

[now repealed], regarding reconstitution and administration of mental health land trust, and accordingly may not be designated by the commissioner of natural resources as replacement mental health trust lands.
November 17, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.40.352.
Sale of land not necessary for railroad purposes.

The corporation may sell land if the board finds (1) the land is not necessary for railroad purposes, and (2) the sale of the land is in the best interest of the state. The sale of land is subject to the terms and conditions of AS

42.40.285

,

42.40.350(d)

, and this section.

Before offering land for sale under this section, the corporation shall

publish public notice of the proposed sale that includes the finding by the board that the land is not necessary for railroad purposes and that the sale is in the best interest of the state;

provide notice to persons having a leasehold interest in the land proposed to be sold and offer the leaseholders the right of first refusal;

receive legislative approval under AS

42.40.285

; and

notify, by registered mail, adjacent landowners of the proposed action.

The corporation shall separately account for the proceeds from the sale of land under this section and shall report the earnings and balance in the account in the annual report required by AS

42.40.260

. Money in the account may be appropriated in accordance with 45 U.S.C. 1207(a)(5) (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982).

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under (b) of this section, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, added (b)(4), and made related changes.

Sec. 42.40.355.
Prohibition.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the state-owned railroad as defined under 45 U.S.C. 1202(14) may not apply for a right-of-way across, or exercise eminent domain in, the western (Kobuk River) unit of the Gates of the Arctic National Preserve under 16 U.S.C. 410hh(4)(b)-(e).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.360.
Request for land.

The board may nominate federal land it determines may be useful for present or future railroad purposes for selection under the Alaska Statehood Act (P.L. 85 — 508, 72 Stat. 339), as amended, and request the commissioner of natural resources to select the land for the state through the federal land selection process.

The board may identify and request the commissioner of natural resources to convey land necessary or useful for present or future railroad purposes owned by or tentatively approved for transfer to the state, including land not contiguous with a railroad utility corridor or rail land. The request must include a statement of and justification for the present or future railroad use. Upon receipt of a request, the commissioner shall temporarily reserve the land identified in the request for railroad purposes and defer disposal or lease of that land under other laws to a party other than the corporation. The temporary reservation of land is subject to valid existing rights and remains in effect for 180 days.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.370.
Conveyance of land.

Within 90 days after receiving a request under AS

42.40.360(b)

the commissioner of natural resources shall by written decision

designate the identified land for railroad purposes and, subject to valid existing rights, convey the state’s interests in the land to the corporation;

notify the corporation of reasons for refusal to designate the identified land for railroad purposes; or

approve the request in part and deny it in part and convey as appropriate.

A conveyance of land under this section may be for less than its appraised value as determined by the commissioner of natural resources.

In the absence of a reservation to the contrary, a conveyance of land under this section vests in the corporation ownership, control of the surface, material and mineral estate, including the right to extract or use timber and other construction materials, sand, gravel, rock, and the right to tunnel, ditch, recontour, excavate, or otherwise use the land for railroad, transportation, transmission, communication, and related purposes.

The corporation may reconvey to the state land received under this section that the corporation and the commissioner of natural resources jointly identify as unnecessary or unsuitable for the corporation’s purposes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.380.
Use of state land.

When emergency conditions require that track or other right-of-way fixtures of the corporation be moved from the existing location and relocated on state land adjacent to or in the vicinity of the existing right-of-way and the chief executive officer determines that relocation is necessary to maintain safe and adequate rail operations, the corporation may effect the relocation and notify the Department of Natural Resources.
The relocation must affect only the amount of state land necessary to adequately restore or continue safe rail operations at a normal level.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.385.
Eminent domain.

The corporation may exercise the power of eminent domain under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

to acquire land for railroad transportation purposes consistent with this chapter. Notwithstanding AS

09.55.250

, the corporation may acquire a fee simple title whenever, in the judgment of the board, ownership of a fee simple title is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The corporation may file a declaration of taking in the manner provided for the state under AS

09.55.420

.

The power of eminent domain conferred under this section includes the power to obtain clay, gravel, sand, timber, rock, or other material for the operation of the railroad, the land necessary to obtain the material, and access to the land and material.

The exercise of the power of eminent domain requires the prior approval of the governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For court rule concerning eminent domain, see Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 72.

Sec. 42.40.390.
Land use rules.

The board may adopt exclusive rules governing land use by parties having interests in or permits for land owned or managed by the corporation.
The power conferred by this section is exercised for the common health, safety, and welfare of the public and to the extent constitutionally permissible, may not be limited by the terms and conditions of leases, contracts, or other transactions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.400.
Vacation of easements.

The corporation may vacate an easement acquired under this chapter by executing and filing a deed in the appropriate recording district.
If the easement was acquired by the corporation under 45 U.S.C. 1201
— 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982), the state shall acquire the easement for use in conformity with those laws.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.410.
Federal land.

Except as provided in AS

42.40.285

(5), the corporation may submit applications on its own behalf as an instrumentality of the state for acquisition of federal land available under federal law that will enhance the operations of the corporation if it is available under a federal law other than the Alaska Statehood Act of 1958 (P.L. 85 — 508, 72 Stat. 339), as amended. The corporation may receive in its own name conveyances of all interests in federal land. In this section, land or interest in land that is not conclusively owned by the United States at the time of transfer is not available and does not satisfy the exception from legislative approval under AS

42.40.285

(5)(C).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under this section, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, added the last sentence.

Sec. 42.40.420.
Public use of railroad land.

Upon request of a municipality or the state, the corporation may authorize use of railroad land for public purposes. Subject to AS

42.40.350(b)

, the corporation shall authorize a walkway or a trail if the board first finds in writing that the proposed walkway or trail will not create a safety hazard and will not unreasonably interfere with continued or expanded operations in the utility corridor. Before authorizing a use under this section, the board shall require the municipality or state to execute an agreement in a form approved by the board to

agree to restrictions, limitations, and conditions on the proposed use required by the corporation and reasonably calculated to reduce the risk of a safety hazard or interference with authorized uses in the utility corridor;

hold the corporation harmless from and indemnify the corporation for liability and claims arising from any use authorized under this section including

defending the corporation in a cause of action brought against the corporation as a result of the use; and

indemnifying the corporation for the amount of a judgment, including prejudgment and postjudgment interest, rendered against the corporation, and for all costs and attorney’s fees incurred by the corporation in settling or defending the claim; and

stop the use upon request of the corporation if the use interferes with expansion or replacement of railroad facilities, creates a safety hazard, or interferes with railroad operations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.430.
Acquisition of government property.

The corporation, as an instrumentality of the state, may acquire in its own name from the United States under 40 U.S.C. 101 et seq. or other law, property under the control of a federal department or agency that is useful for the corporation’s purposes. The corporation may acquire from the Department of Administration property of the state made available under AS

44.68.110

—

44.68.140

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 91 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

50 U.S.C. App. 1622-1622c (Surplus Property Act of 1944) was repealed by sec. 7(b), P.L. 103-272.

Sec. 42.40.435.
Exchange of land.

The corporation may exchange land subject to AS

42.40.285

. The corporation is an instrumentality and agency of the state for purposes of exchanging land with the United States, municipalities, corporations including corporations formed under 43 U.S.C. 1601 —
1628 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), and individuals.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.440.
Use of pesticides and herbicides.

Vegetation control involving the use of pesticides or herbicides on land owned or managed by the corporation may be conducted only in compliance with state requirements applicable to other state pesticide or herbicide use.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.450.
Adverse possession.

No prescription or statute of limitations runs against the title or interest of the corporation to or in land owned by the corporation or under its jurisdiction.
Title to or interest in land owned by the corporation or under its jurisdiction may not be acquired by adverse possession or prescription, or in any other manner except by conveyance from or formal vacation by the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.460.
Extension of the Alaska Railroad.

The corporation may delineate a proposed transportation corridor between the existing railroad utility corridor of the Alaska Railroad and the border of Alaska and Canada. The transportation corridor shall be 500 feet wide except where, in the corporation’s discretion, physical obstacles or private land ownership patterns make a narrower transportation corridor appropriate. The transportation corridor may be designated for a use identified under AS

38.35.020(a)

or AS

42.40.350(b)

, and, subject to this section, other transportation and utility uses. The corporation may also identify land for use as rail land that can be developed for terminal, station, and maintenance facilities, switching yards, and other purposes associated with the transportation corridor. The corporation shall prepare a complete legal description of the proposed transportation corridor and the rail land identified under this subsection.

In performing the work authorized by (a) of this section, the corporation, in consultation with interested parties, shall consider the following factors:

safety;

grade and alignment standards that are commensurate with rail and utility construction standards and that minimize the prospect of at-grade railroad and highway crossings;

availability of construction materials;

effects on and service to adjacent communities and potential intermodal transportation connections;

environmental concerns;

use of public land to the maximum degree possible;

minimization of probable construction costs;

the location of and the opportunity to obtain access to identified natural resources that could contribute significantly to the economic development of the state and Canada;

avoidance of possibly unstable ground due to thawing of frozen soils; and

prior and established traditional uses.

If the corporation identifies all or a portion of the proposed transportation corridor or associated rail land and if the Department of Natural Resources, after consultation with the corporation and potentially affected parties, finds that the location of the proposed transportation corridor and associated rail land minimizes adverse effects on existing and potential rights-of-way and land uses associated with the location, construction, and operation of a gas pipeline in a manner that is in the best interest of the state,

the Department of Natural Resources shall reserve the transportation corridor and associated rail land across state land identified by the corporation, subject to valid existing rights and provisions of this section;

the department shall continue to manage the land reserved under (1) of this subsection; the department shall consult with the corporation before disposing of an interest in land within the transportation corridor and associated rail land; the department shall condition authorizations for activities on the reserved land to protect the right of the corporation to construct the railroad or other uses identified for the land;

the department and the corporation shall cooperate to identify, on a continuing basis and to the extent practicable, the potential crossings for economic development and public access along the land reserved for the transportation corridor and associated rail land; and

while the land is reserved for the transportation corridor and associated rail land under this subsection, the department may retain money received from disposal or third-party use of the land.

If the corporation notifies the Department of Natural Resources that the corporation will begin construction of a railroad improvement on a segment of the transportation corridor or associated rail land and the corporation has identified a source of funding for the construction, then, as of the beginning of construction of that segment, the department shall delegate authority to manage land within that segment of the transportation corridor and associated rail land to the corporation, including the authority to authorize or permit use of the land by third parties under the provisions of this chapter, subject to

valid existing rights; and

the authority of the department

to identify and reserve rights-of-way for potential future crossings under (g) of this section; and

after consultation with the corporation, to identify, reserve, authorize, and manage land within the transportation corridor and associated rail land for future right-of-way leases and uses under AS 38.35.

Upon completion of construction of the railroad improvement on all or a portion of the reserved transportation corridor or associated rail land,

the corporation shall, without cost to the Department of Natural Resources, provide the department with a survey of the state land within a 200-foot corridor, 100 feet on each side of the as-built centerline of track, and the associated rail land;

the Department of Natural Resources shall convey the state’s entire interest in the land within the boundaries of the survey to the corporation, subject to valid existing rights, and reserving to the state (A) the interests required by AS

38.05.125

; (B) the right of the department to identify and reserve rights-of-way for potential future crossings under (g) of this section; and (C) the authority of the department to identify, reserve, authorize, and manage land within the transportation corridor and associated rail land for future right-of-way leases and uses under AS 38.35; the conveyance of land under this paragraph shall be without cost to the corporation except for the direct administrative costs of the department;

the Department of Natural Resources shall assign any existing contracts within that segment of the transportation corridor and associated rail land to the corporation; the corporation may thereafter retain the revenue from the conveyed land; the department shall prorate revenue from contracts affecting both conveyed and unconveyed land;

the remaining state land in a segment of the transportation corridor in which the corporation has received a conveyance under this section shall be managed by the Department of Natural Resources as a transportation corridor unless the department determines the land is no longer needed for that purpose; and

the remaining segments of the transportation corridor in which the corporation has not completed construction and any associated state land designated as rail land shall continue to be managed by the Department of Natural Resources as a transportation corridor and associated rail land under (c) and (d) of this section.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, before the Department of Natural Resources grants a gas pipeline right-of-way lease under AS

38.35.020(a)

across a transportation corridor or associated rail land delineated, identified, reserved, or conveyed under this section, the department shall consult with the corporation; if a railroad improvement has not been constructed on a segment of the transportation corridor or associated rail land that is crossed by the proposed gas pipeline right-of-way, the department may adjust the location of the transportation corridor or associated rail land if the department finds that relocation of the transportation corridor or associated rail land to accommodate the proposed gas pipeline right-of-way is in the best interest of the state.

In delegating management authority over or conveying all or a portion of state land to the corporation, the Department of Natural Resources shall reserve the right to authorize, by lease, permit, or other method, a person to cross or construct access across the transportation corridor and associated rail land; however, before authorizing a crossing or construction of access, the department shall obtain concurrence from the corporation that the proposed crossing or construction is consistent with applicable safety standards and, to the extent practical, minimizes effects on railroad operating efficiency. Neither the corporation nor the state is liable for claims arising from public use of the transportation corridor and associated rail land, except to the extent the claims arise from the gross negligence of the state, the corporation, their employees, or their contractors, respectively. The department shall indemnify the corporation consistent with AS

42.40.420

(1) — (3) for claims or related litigation arising from an authorization issued by the department under this section, except to the extent the claims arise from the gross negligence of the corporation, its employees, or its contractors.

The corporation shall,

as the corporation considers appropriate, exercise its authority under this chapter to acquire rights-of-way across land within the transportation corridor and associated rail land that is subject to the corporation’s power of eminent domain;

upon delineation of the transportation corridor and identification of associated rail land, expeditiously work with federal officials to secure reclassification and withdrawal of federal land for reservations and rights-of-way across the federal land for use as transportation corridor and rail land; and

before undertaking acquisition of federal land, prepare a report evaluating the effects of construction of an extension of the Alaska Railroad across federal land; the statement must satisfy the requirements for an environmental impact statement under 42 U.S.C. 4332.

The requirements of AS

38.04.065

and

38.05.300

, relating to classification and reclassification of land, are inapplicable to actions taken by the Department of Natural Resources under this section.

The Department of Natural Resources shall retain the classifications and reservations of land identified for use as a proposed utility corridor and railroad right-of-way under former AS

19.05.122

until the corporation informs the department in writing that the land is not needed by the corporation for a utility corridor. If, under (a) of this section, the corporation includes land identified under former AS

19.05.122

as part of the proposed transportation corridor, the department shall manage that land under provisions of this section.

To complete the work authorized by this section, the corporation may enter into agreements relating to the work with the federal government, an agency or instrumentality of the state, a municipality, or a private organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 2004)

Sec. 42.40.465.
Extension of the Alaska Railroad to connect with the North American railroad system.

The corporation may investigate extension of the Alaska Railroad from the border of Alaska and Canada to connect with the North American railroad system. The corporation may acquire land or interests in land in Canada as the corporation considers appropriate for the development, construction, and operation of an extension of the Alaska Railroad to connect with the North American railroad system.

In performing the work authorized by (a) of this section, the corporation shall consider the following factors:

safety;

grade and alignment standards that are commensurate with rail and utility construction standards and that minimize the prospect of at-grade railroad and highway crossings;

availability of construction materials;

effects on and service to adjacent communities and potential intermodal transportation connections;

environmental concerns;

use of public land to the maximum degree possible;

minimization of probable construction costs;

the location of and the opportunity to obtain access to identified natural resources that could contribute significantly to the economic development of the state and Canada;

avoidance of possibly unstable ground due to thawing of frozen soils; and

prior and established traditional uses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 2004)